Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1328
Judicial sale; deed of commissioner; form and execution.

The deed of a master commissioner shall contain the like recital and shall be executed, acknowledged and recorded in the same manner as the deed of a sheriff of real property sold under execution.

R.S.1867, Code § 453, p. 468;

R.S.1913, § 8021;

C.S.1922, § 8962;

C.S.1929, § 20-1328;

R.S.1943, § 25-1328.